Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1335.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of November 22, 1978 (P.L.1166, No.274), referred to as the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 7.3. Investigation and Prosecution of Internet Crimes Against Children Program.(a) Establishment.--The Investigation and Prosecution of Internet Crimes Against Children Program is established within the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency.(b) Use.--Money available to the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency for the Investigation and Prosecution of Internet Crimes Against Children Program shall be used to 1234567891011121314151617181920 provide grants:(1) to law enforcement agencies to establish or support task forces of State or local investigators and prosecutors, which may include forensic specialists and education specialists, to investigate and prosecute violations of 18 Pa.C.S. Chs. 30 (relating to human trafficking) and 31 (relating to sexual offenses) and 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 6312 (relating to sexual abuse of children), 6318 (relating to unlawful contact with minor) and 6320 (relating to sexual exploitation of children) committed on the Internet against individuals under 18 years of age;(2) to task forces that receive funding under 34 U.S.C. Ch. 211 Subch. I (relating to national strategy for child exploitation prevention and interdiction) to supplement Federal funding received under 34 U.S.C. § 21116 (relating to ICAC grant program); or(3) for the purpose of training members of task forces under paragraphs (1) and (2) in the best practices of detecting, investigating and prosecuting violations of 18 Pa.C.S. Chs. 30 and 31 and 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 6312, 6318 and 6320 committed on the Internet against individuals under 18 years of age or the purposes of a task force under 34 U.S.C. § 21113 (relating to purpose of ICAC task forces).(c) Guidelines.--The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency shall adopt guidelines for the administration of the Investigation and Prosecution of Internet Crimes Against Children Program and a scoring process for the awarding of grants, which guidelines shall include consideration of geographical dispersion of task forces under subsection (b).(d) Funding.--Grants received under the Investigation and 20260SB1335PN1728 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Prosecution of Internet Crimes Against Children Program shall be in addition to funding under 34 U.S.C. Ch. 211 Subch. I or any other Federal or State funding.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1335PN1728 - 3 - 1234